Alaska statutes. Title 27. Mining.
Article 1. Department of Natural Resources.

Sec. 27.05.010.
Department responsible for mineral resources.

The department has charge of all matters affecting exploration, development, and mining of the mineral resources of the state, the collection and dissemination of all official information relative to the mineral resources, and mines and mining projects of the state, and the administration of the laws with respect to all kinds of mining.

The department is the lead agency for all matters relating to the exploration, development, and management of mining, and, in its capacity as lead agency, shall coordinate all regulatory matters concerning mineral resource exploration, development, mining, and associated activities. Before a state agency takes action that may directly or indirectly affect the exploration, development, or management of mineral resources, the agency shall consult with and draw upon the mining expertise of the department.

History.

(§ 47-3-111 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 60 SLA 1995)

Administrative Code. —

For staking, recording and maintaining claims and leasehold locations, see 11 AAC 86, art. 2.

For placer mining demonstration grants, see 18 AAC 71.

Sec. 27.05.020.
Conflict of interest prohibited.

In conducting the inquiries and investigations authorized by AS

27.05.010

—

27.05.070

, no officer or employee of the department may have a personal or private interest in a mine or the products of a mine under investigation or accept employment from a private party for services in the examination of private mineral property.
Nothing in this section prevents employment by the department, in a consulting capacity or in the investigation of special subjects, of an engineer or other expert whose principal professional practice is not employment by the department.

History.

(§ 47-3-115 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 27.05.030.
Cooperation with federal departments.

The department shall cooperate with the heads of executive departments of the United States in making investigations and in disseminating information to stimulate mining, quarrying, and metallurgical industries in the state, and in providing for the inspection of mines and protection of lives of miners.

History.

(§ 47-3-114 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 27.05.040.
Negotiations with federal departments and other agencies.

The department may negotiate with the federal departments and other agencies for arrangements that it considers expedient for cooperation with those departments and agencies in formulating and carrying out policies and projects designed to encourage and assist in the development of the mineral resources of the state.

History.

(§ 47-3-116 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 27.05.050.
Survey of resources and mining operations and dissemination of information.

The department shall conduct a continuing survey of the mineral resources and mining operations of the state and shall disseminate information regarding them to assist prospectors and miners, safeguard the lives and health of miners, protect investors in the mining industry, and foster and promote the best interests of the mining, mineral, and related industries of the state.

History.

(§ 47-3-117 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 27.05.060.
Annual report.

The department shall make an annual report to the governor on all essential matters with regard to mining in the state. The department shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

History.

(§ 47-3-119 ACLA 1949; am § 52 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Sec. 27.05.070.
Assistance to miners and prospectors.

The department shall, so far as practicable, throughout the state assist miners and prospectors by

giving information as to mineral deposits gained from the minerals survey of the state;

securing and examining samples and applying tests upon the ground, or in the office or laboratory, and advising as to the nature of a mineral and as to the best methods of analysis, sampling, assay, and test;

reporting to the governor the location of roads, trails, and bridges as in its opinion are reasonably necessary for the development of mineral resources;

giving advice, information, and directions as may be of assistance to the miners and prospectors of the state.

History.

(§ 47-3-120 ACLA 1949)